Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 1.1 Consistency of Interpretation

46-1.1-1.
Consistency of interpretation with title 46, chapter 23.

Sections

46-1-1

,

46-1-2

,

46-2-2

,

46-2-4

,

46-6-1

,

46-6-2

and

46-6-6

shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with the designation of the coastal resources management council as the lead state agency for dredging as provided for in §

46-23-1(e)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 8; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 8.